zh-TW: 手持打擊樂器尺寸等級: 特大; 大; 中; 迷你; 小; 其他
zh-CN: 手持打击乐器尺寸等级: 特大号; 大号; 中号; 迷你; 小号; 其他
lt-LT: Rankinių mušamųjų dydžio klasė: Labai didelis; Didelis; Vidutinis; Mini; Mažas; Kita
th: ประเภทขนาดของเครื่องดนตรีประเภทเคาะด้วยมือ: ใหญ่พิเศษ; ใหญ่; กลาง; มินิ; เล็ก; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Classe de tamanho de percussão manual: Extra grande; Grande; Médio; Mini; Pequeno; Outro
tr: El perküsyon boyut sınıfı: Ekstra büyük; Büyük; Orta; Mini; Küçük; Diğer
nb: Håndslagverk størrelsesklasse: Ekstra stor; Stor; Medium; Mini; Liten; Annet
pt-PT: classe de tamanho de percussão manual: Muito grande; Grande; Médio; Mini; Pequeno; Outro
bg-BG: Размерен клас на ръчния перкусионен инструмент: Много голям; Голям; Среден; Мини; Малък; Друго
it: Percussioni a mano classe ta: Extra large; Grande; Medio; Mini; Piccolo; Altro
sk-SK: Veľkostná kategória ručných perkusií: Extra veľké; Veľké; Stredné; Mini; Malé; Iné
ro-RO: Clasa dimensiune percuție manuală: Foarte mare; Mare; Mediu; Mini; Mic; Altele
hu: Kézi ütőhangszer méretbesorolása: Extra nagy; Nagy; Közepes; Mini; Kicsi; Egyéb
ru: Размерный класс ручной перкуссии: Очень большой; Большой; Средний; Мини; Маленький; Другое
sl-SI: Razred velikosti ročnih tolkal: Zelo veliko; Veliko; Srednje; Mini; Majhno; Drugo
de: Größenklasse der Handperkussion: Extra groß; Groß; Mittel; Mini; Klein; Sonstige
sv: Storleksklass för handhållet slagverk: Extra stor; Stor; Medium; Mini; Liten; Övrigt
es: Clase de tamaño para percusión manual: Extra grande; Grande; Mediano; Mini; Pequeño; Otro
ko: 손 타악기 사이즈 클래스: 엑스트라 라지; 라지; 미디엄; 미니; 스몰; 기타
hr-HR: Klasa veličine ručnih udaraljki: Iznimno veliko; Veliko; Srednje; Mini; Malo; Ostalo
vi: Phân loại kích thước nhạc cụ gõ cầm tay: Rất lớn; Lớn; Trung bình; Mini; Nhỏ; Khác
ja: ハンドパーカッションサイズクラス: 特大; 大; 中; ミニ; 小; その他
fr: Classe de taille de la percussion à main: Très grand; Grand; Moyen; Mini; Petit; Autre
nl: Handpercussie maatklasse: Extra large; Large; Medium; Mini; Small; Overig
el: Κατηγορία μεγέθους κρουστών χειρός: Πολύ μεγάλο; Μεγάλο; Μεσαίο; Μίνι; Μικρό; Άλλο
fi: Kädessä pidettävien lyömäsoittimien kokoluokka: Erittäin suuri; Suuri; Keskikokoinen; Mini; Pieni; Muu
cs: Kategorie velikostí ručních bicích nástrojů: Extra velké; Velké; Střední; Mini; Malé; Jiné
da: Størrelsesklasse for håndpercussion: Ekstra stor; Stor; Medium; Mini; Lille; Andet
en: Hand percussion size class: Extra large; Large; Medium; Mini; Small; Other
pl: Klasa rozmiaru ręcznego instrumentu perkusyjnego: Bardzo duży; Duży; Średni; Mini; Mały; Inne